Authors
Joan Ellis
Number of Reviews
41

Title
Review for Girl 6 (1996)
Spike Lee's "Girl 6" is an inexcusable bore. The
producer/director has turned lazy. Don't look for a story; don't
anticipate a laugh or a tear or a surprise;  don't go. But do ask
yourself how anything this thin and badly done could make it out
of Lee's head, much less onto the multiplex screens.
Girl 6 (Theresa Randle) wants to be an actress. If you're
going to build a movie on that shopworn notion, you better have
fairy dust in your pocket. To pay the rent she takes a job as
girl #6 in a phone-sex telephone bank. "O.K., that's a new one:
what shall we do with it?  Let's string together all the phone
sex words and images we can muster and blow the audience away."
Mr. Lee, it seems, is unaware that mainstream America is
bombarded daily in our multimedia culture with the words and
images he finds so hilarious. Girl 6 sits in her cubicle
responding to the "hear me, hit me, fix me" phone calls that come
in from men who sneak their telephone pleasure. Mr. Lee seems
gleeful in informing us that many of them are corporate
executives. Wow. Really?
As added interest, he promotes Girl 6 to the rank of
"Fantasy Caller."  Same game, with the added freedom of working
from home--the better to abandon yourself, you see.
We wait in vain for one of the phone calls to develop into
an interesting subplot. A love story perhaps?  A crime? 
Anything?  No. Operating on a zero baseline, Lee shoots his
picture full of celebrity cameos, sure that this will do the
trick in a society that values such things. 
It's a little hard to tell whether Quentin Tarantino is
playing himself or a fictional Hollywood hotshot of the month.
Madonna once again enjoys assuming a disguise--this time, a
small-time boss in the world of secondhand gratification. The
marvelous Halle Berry is on hand, to no effect. The failure of
the presence of these proven performers to ignite anything is
just further proof that Lee forgot to build the fire.
The Spike Lee who captured pieces of American culture with
such piercing precision in "Jungle Fever" and "Do The Right
Thing" seems to have succumbed to the inevitable. There's an
unattractive arrogance to thinking that millions of people will
be interested in one long, rotten, hypocritical evening of
telephone sex without any connective storyline. He even dares to
imply a comparison to Meg Ryan's sublime coffee-shop orgasm in
"When Harry Met Sally" without any of the sly humor to put it
across. 
Lee's assumption that this hodgepodge can grab an audience
is astonishing. His callers count their fantasies in minutes, but
he smothers us for almost two hours with his own. The inescapable
conclusion is that he too has chosen the easy road to
self-gratification. Don't let it be at your expense.

Title
Review for Bridges of Madison County, The (1995)
     The fun of THE BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY is to figure out why a
badly written book that has now become a decent, if implausible, movie
has captured the imaginations of millions of Americans for the last
three years.
     The answer can only be that all who read or see it are projecting
a deep piece of their emotional lives into the story.  Robert James
Waller's style is irrelevant; what he did, it seems, is create a blank
page for the collective fantasy.  THE BRIDGES OF MADISON COUNTY is an
invitation to consider what might have been, permission to think about
what was missed or what was lost.  As Robert Kincaid and Francesca
Johnson, Clint Eastwood and Meryl Streep become the vessels for the
inner lives of their audience.
     After overcoming some awful overacting in the opening scene by
Victor Slezak as Francesca's son, Michael, they go on to play out a
gentle, tender affair that is rooted in decency.  With her family away
at a four-day farm show, Francesca's fires are kindled by Robert, a
National Geographic photographer enticed by the bridges of the small
Midwestern farm town.  Forget the faint likelihood of Meryl Streep as a
farm wife or Clint Eastwood as an unattached lover who is free to ask
her to run away with him.  It's O.K. this time; they are merely our
surrogates in this dream.
     "How sad it is," Francesca says, "to leave this earth without your
children ever knowing who you were."  You can feel the audience melt
into sadness.  And over the whole looms the probability that this
concrete realization of the universal need for connection will
evaporate, because "the minute we leave this place, everything will
change."
     Eastwood and Streep play in gentle understatement, where the
question, "Would you like some iced tea?" carries all the loneliness of
their lives.  It is a story about falling in love far more than about
acting out lust, and it cries out the sadness that so much love has to
take place in secrecy.
     The movie propels itself slowly with a lot of meaningful staring
and long silences while Francesca decides whether she can abandon an
entire life to start a new one. "When a woman marries and has children,
love begins and love stops," she says with a clear grasp of her "life
of details."  When her family returns to show her their triumphs, the
life she leads for others stares her full in the face.
     It is not a stretch to say that romantic love is short-lived
inside or out of marriage.  Whatever wrongful, sad, or transcendent form
it later takes, the initial period of discovery and passion is a joy
that lodges in the soul.  Carrying it off with a lovely, gentle
chemistry, Eastwood and Streep invite us to reinvent our lives.  They
touch the need in the collective unconscious to connect with another
human being.  That bad book has come a long way.


Title
Review for Last Supper, The (1995)
"The Last Supper" is the perfect title for this sardonic
comedy.  A group of self-satisfied grad students gathers on
Sunday nights to discuss the fine points of issues on which they
all agree.  Since they have yet to engage real life on any level,
they are free to wallow in the untested smugness of their
academic theories.  They are young liberals.
Their habit is to invite an alien thinker to stir the pot at
their Sunday suppers.  When fate deposits a monstrous bigot at
the table, the pot comes to a full boil that ends in murder. 
Faced with an act unimaginable to their humanist sensibilities
just a moment earlier, the students analyze their options much as
they might the pros and cons of going into Bosnia.  
Call the police? Claim self-defense? Bury him in the
backyard?  Quickly, they decide that sacrificing superior
intellect to a jail term for killing an unworthy facist is not an
option.  At this point, the movie takes an abrupt turn into black
humor as the now practiced murderers invite an increasingly
outrageous stream of right-wing zealots to share their table
before dispatching them to the backyard to fertilize their
tomatoes.  
Freed from the suspense of a serious thriller, we ponder the
theoretical questions flying around the screen and laugh
nervously at the comic calm that accompanies the ritual murders. 
We enjoy the choice of murder weapon that establishes collective
guilt, but watching guests and hosts  imprisoned in their own
rectitude is not the fluffy fun of Agatha Christie.  
A reverend intones that "homosexuality is the disease, and
AIDS is the cure."  Another posits that women invite rape,
another that the homeless must "know their place."  The
anti-environmentalist crows, "If the spotted owl's time is up..." 
They smart just a little when a young conservative attacks: 
"It's your generation's morality that has put my generation at
risk."
Oblivious to what they are doing in the name of higher
cause, the graduate students continue to dissect the
hypotheticals that feed their egos: Would you have killed Hitler
before he became Hitler?  At what point is it O.K. to kill
someone who is becoming an evil force on this planet?  Blind to
any idea that is not their own, these budding intellects are
arrogant hypocrits who toast themselves for "making the world a
better place and making a difference...we wouldn't kill anyone
unless we couldn't change their minds."  
Director Stacy Title and his crew have a very good time
using the ugly extremes of conservative zealotry to skewer the
self-righteousness of liberal piety.  Cameron Diaz, Bill Paxton,
Jason Alexander, Mark Harmon, and Annabeth Gish manage to mock
extemism in any form.  
We are reminded that the student who says, "We're liberals;
we do the right thing," usually grows up to be a conservative,
while the student who consistently tries to do the right thing
grows up to be the conscience of democracy.  


Title
Review for Walk in the Clouds, A (1995)
     A WALK IN THE CLOUDS is a little brother of LIKE WATER FOR
CHOCOLATE--full of admiration for the big guy, not quite strong enough
to go it alone.  Director Alfonso Arau has brought the golden light,
the family kitchen, and even some chocolate from his earlier film, but
he lost some of its spirit on the journey from Mexico to America.
     Paul Sutton (Keanu Reeves) returns from World War II to a wife who
is obsessed with material success.  Stunned at the gulf between them,
Paul bolts for a cross-country journey of self-discovery and
immediately meets Victoria (Aitana Sanchez-Gijon), who is returning to
her family vineyard pregnant and abandoned.
     Posing as newlyweds in order to dim her father's anger, the couple
goes home together.  As they come over the hill, the vineyard
materializes in the amber glow of fairy tales.  The world is suddenly
awash in the sights and sounds of pretend.  Crickets, moonbeams, and
acres of grapes appear in a rush of music.  When the bells ring the
warning of impending frost, the family dons butterfly wings and, in a
graceful ballet, fans the heat from the frost fires downward to the
endangered fruit.
     Paul suffers a torrent of abuse from Alberto (Giancarlo Giannini),
who, like all the people and events in this movie, is painted in
extremes of gruffness and love.  Ms. Sanchez-Gijon is just right as
the spirited Victoria, but Keanu Reeves is an enigma as Paul.
     Whenever he keeps his mouth shut, which is most of the time, he
has the innocent air of a soldier/idealist, but when he talks, his
voice and emotions are flat.  Speaking, he undermines the tale; in
silence, he enhances it.  But let's not quibble.  We have decided to
surrender.
     Don Pedro, the patriarch of this Mexican-American clan, propels
himself on a diet of cigars, chocolate, and bread, and watches over the
Only Daughter, the Angry Son, the Harvest, the Fire, and Demon Drink.
Anthony Quinn has an emotional field day.
     Be warned that you must hold fast to your mood when Victoria, for
example, says, "It's not your problem."  At times like these, we
remember reluctantly that we are in California, not Mexico; that it is
1945, not today.  But you'll recover.
     You have choices to make.  You can choose to see Keanu Reeves as a
wooden totem, or you can see him as the sweet innocence of World War
II.  You can choose to be annoyed by the cliche or to smile when a
sleeping populace is roused and brought to the windows by a love song.
You can choose to see the fire as ludicrous or as a labored metaphor
for family pain.  The family and its vineyard spring to life like a
pop-up book suddenly opened, which isn't necessarily bad in a movie
that begs us, unashamedly, for willing surrender.  Considering the
world outside this fairy tale, it's quite a fine way to spend an
evening.
For all Ellis reviews, see http://movie.infocom.net (which has a search engine)
or send any email to: movie@telecomp.com
Feel free to reuse as long as source acknowledged.
Please send information regarding reuse to 'nebbadoon@telecomp.com'

Title
Review for Piano, The (1993)
     In THE PIANO, Jane Campion transports the audience to another
world and time immediately and with absolute precision.  The gray of
her New Zealand sea and sky is grayer, grander, more forbidding than
our experience of it elsewhere.  The stark image of the piano standing
in the swirling surf will endure.
     Next to the piano, waiting, sit Ada and her nine-year-old
daughter, Flora, an arranged family for Stewart, a lonely Englishman
working his land among the Maori in the New Zealand bush of the 19th
century.  Borne through the surf by canoes from their ship, they spend
the night under the hoop of her skirt, half a world away from their
native Scotland and without a notion of what may await them.
     What awaits them is Stewart who arrives with a band of Maori
bearers and his roughly silent neighbor, Baines.  The piano is too
heavy, Stewart says.  It will stay on the beach.  Ada, who hasn't
spoken a word since she was six, still manages to let the intractable
Stewart know her rage.  Silence is no indicator of this woman's power.
It is Baines who rescues the piano, Ada's voice for all she feels.
     It is in this, possibly the film's most memorable scene, that
Campion begins to pose implied questions that she leaves unanswered.
She shrouds the emotions of her characters in mystery.  Campion has the
eye of a visionary and the singular skill to capture what she sees.
The seriousness of the film is punctuated with a wit that flows from
her camera, not her words.
     Ada can earn her piano back, Baines tells her, by coming to his
house to give him lessons.  One visit for every key, he says; only the
black keys, she replies.  And so this improbable pair explores the
passion unleashed in both of them while Stewart stands by, submerged in
emotion he has never felt before.
     This is an extraordinary exploration of passion and betrayal as it
explodes in the remote bush, removed from the eyes of conventional
society, but judged with brutal intensity by the players themselves.
The cast is beyond praise in conveying Campion's vision of a woman who
speaks through her music to the two men who want her.  Without words to
distract us, we inhabit Ada's soul.
     Holly Hunter gives an achingly original performance as Ada,
playing Michael Nyman's music herself as naturally as if she were
speaking.  Sam Neill is superb as the vulnerable Stewart who loses his
protective covering, and Harvey Keitel brings startling sensitivity to
the solitary, innocent Baines.
     Jane Campion pulled her company into her vision, took them off to
the New Zealand bush and with their wise collaboration, captured it on
film.  The actors seem, as much as the characters they play, a group
caught in time and place and passion.  In perfect harmony with their
director, they draw the audience into their strikingly beautiful and
disturbing film so thoroughly that an entire audience sits numbed as
the final credits roll.


Title
Review for Postino, Il (1994)
     THE POSTMAN is a beautiful, heartbreaking movie about a very
different kind of friendship in an outpost of the old world.  Mario
(Massimo Troisi), the reluctant fisherman in a fishermen's culture,
catches cold every time he sets foot in a boat. He takes a modest job
delivering mail by bicycle to Pablo Neruda (Phillipe Noiret), the
renowned poet living in exile from Chile. Poetry becomes their
connection.
     The friendship of the unlikely pair speaks the sad truth that we
can rarely tell our friends about the inner forces that drive us
through life. Much later, in despair, Mario returns to the poet's house
to revisit the place that had once been alive with the sounds and
sights of emotional discovery.  In the silence that now envelops it,
the loss of joy is simply overwhelming.  It is a wrenching scene.
     Mario has a face of piercing intelligence with sharply angled
cheekbones and the saddest eyes you will ever see. He has fallen in
love with Beatrice, and he turns to the poet, Neruda, for help in
overcoming the halting awkwardness he brings to the courtship. The
friendship between the exalted poet and the postman is sublime, the
sadness of it is unbearable.
     The simple dedication, "To our friend Massimo," is a deeply simple
tribute to Massimo Troisi, the actor who died at 41, one day after
filming ended and just before the surgery he had postponed in order to
finish the film.  Hobbled by illness during the production, he was
driven to deliver this message about heartbreak and friendship. We can
all be grateful that he felt so strongly.
For all Ellis reviews, see http://movie.infocom.net (which has a search engine)
or send any email to: movie@telecomp.com
Feel free to reuse as long as source acknowledged.
Please send information regarding reuse to 'nebbadoon@telecomp.com'

Title
Review for Boys on the Side (1995)
     Take a bunch of traditional elements, add a 90s twist, give it a
shake, and you have BOYS ON THE SIDE.  It is a road movie with a love
affair, an illness, and relationship problems, but this time around the
disease is AIDS, and the love affair is between two women.  The good
news is that the first half of the movie is played for laughs and gets
them.
     Jane (Whoopi Goldberg) is the lesbian, Robin (Mary-Louise Parker),
a smart gal with a problem, and Holly (Drew Barrymore), a refugee from
a lover who is an abusive cretin.  During the long drive to Tucson,
their personalities bubble up in comic conflict.  The rational,
orderly, sensible Robin appears to be, but of course isn't, a Donna
Reed retread whose favorite road songs are Carpenter hits.  Jane is a
rock singer who has seen enough of life to be relaxed and flexible
about whatever comes her way.
     The odd couple is joined at the last minute by Holly, who jumps
aboard with nothing in hand but a flirtatious spirit that is ignited by
every man she meets.  She's all attitude with platinum hair and bright
red nails, and she's thoroughly incorrigible.  Together they make
crazy, zany, flaky fun on the kind of journey that washes even the most
conservative of women in a freedom that only the open road can offer.
     The problems start when the road trip ends.  Once in Tucson, the
movie shifts abruptly to a leaden focus on the serious problems each
has brought from her old life.  It turns sad.  The sad side of comedy
is usually implicit and doesn't need to be hammered home as it is
here.  Director Herbert Ross lets sweetness turn to melodrama.
     As long as it stays on the wacky periphery of the American highway
culture, it's a good time.  Enjoy the airplane sitting in a suburban
backyard.  And be grateful that, just as we feel the movie slipping
away, Ross whips us back up, mercifully, with Holly's exactly right
love affair with a straight cop, who is thrilled she is pregnant with
another guy's child.
     The performances save the movie.  Whoopi Goldberg makes the most
of her wise tolerance for the foibles of others, wringing many of the
laughs from her reactions to the antics of her friends.  Mary-Louise
Parker lights up a fairly grim role with some inspired kidding around
on the road, rising to full flower as the mediator of a comically
horrible fight between the cretin and the flirt.
     Drew Barrymore has a true comedian's enviable ability to telegraph
what's coming without overdoing it, greatly prolonging the fun.  She is
delightful as the thickheaded, sweet-spirited flirt.  If you want an
hour of good laughs against a landscape of 90s dilemmas, then this
one's for you.  It is surely weakened by the final melodrama, but it
still beats staying home to pay the bills.
--
Permission is granted free of charge to quote Joan Ellis reviews
for any promotional, editorial, or critical use provided credit
is given: Nebbadoon Syndicate -- JOAN ELLIS
Please send information regarding reuse to 'nebbadoon@telecomp.com'
or 393 Hanover Center Road, Hanover Center, Etna, NH 03750
Tel 603-643-0400, Fax 603-643-0404

Title
Review for Waterworld (1995)
     WATERWORLD is definitely a bad hair movie.  Dennis Hopper has none,
Kevin Costner's is thinning, and Hopper's assistant thug looks as if
his has been growing for decades.  In the absence of humor, drama, or
character chemistry, you notice things like that.
     This movie just can't make up its mind.  Should it be a spiritual
sea epic, or should it be this year's violent action movie?  The primal
man/woman/child unit is pitted against the sea in search of any spot of
dry land than might have survived the melting of the polar icecaps.  The
Mariner (Costner), Helen (Jeanne Tripplehorn), and Enola (Tina
Majorino), a little girl with a cryptic map to dry land tattooed on her
back, glisten with sweat and grow progressively weaker from sun and
salt in pale imitation of all lifeboat movies.
     Just as we are pondering the seriousness of the problem, a band of
the silliest villains you ever saw streaks over the horizon on Jet
Skis.  Armed with grisly weapons fashioned from the leftovers of
civilization, the Smokers are chasing the mariner, "the gentleman
guppy," whose gills are hidden mercifully behind his ears.
     Dennis Hopper is here to reprise his bad guy personality as the
Deacon, the Mariner's villainous rival.  If there is water, water
everywhere and not a drop to drink (converted urine serves), it doesn't
bother the Deacon, who has an endless supply of scotch, which he swills
while haranguing the world's survivors who are clustered on the rusting
hull of the infamous Exxon Valdez, which serves as their floating
home.
     The Smokers and the survivors, in spite of living in an ocean that
could clean them, are comically and inexplicably filthy.  Clad in
clothes and accents that range from imagined Renaissance to Grunge,
they seem to have passed through Krook's rag-and-bone shop on their way
to a company outing by the ocean.  It's a hodgepodge so ridiculous that
even a good performance by the little girl and some spiffy photography
of fireballs can't lift the leaden mass.
     Standing topside in a three-cornered hat to address the cheering
faithful.  The Deacon, in a charitable interpretation, is a sly
metaphor for the fundamentalist preachers who sermonize about family
values while they drink, womanize, and indulge themselves in luxury
bought with the contributions of their parishioners.  In the
uncharitable view, he's just a jerk.
     Covering his gouged eye socket with a patch and sporting a cleaver
as an artificial hand, Hopper tries mightily to invest his character
with a wink from his remaining eye to tell us this movie is fun.  But
even he can't surmount the deadly dullness of Kevin Costner's vision.
     If this is Costner's warning that we are ruining the planet, he
delivers it with a mailed fist.  This very earnest man has made a movie
without the redeeming qualities of romance, drama, or humor.  Is it
possible that he mistakes seriousness for dignity?  This is a lifeless
movie.  And don't even ask where the money went.


Title
Review for Maverick (1994)
     MAVERICK is an irreverent, zestful romp for three stars who team
up to poke fun at every imaginable Western cliche.  With winks in their
eyes, they play games with a runaway stagecoach, the hangman's noose,
crooked card games and bank robbers.  Their good spirits lift the
picture to inspired spoof status in the avalanche of New Age westerns.
     Bret Maverick (Mel Gibson), Annabelle Bransford (Jody Foster) and
Marshal Zane Cooper (James Garner) are charming rogues, con artists who
can barely contain the pleasure of their wicked ways.  Outdoing each
other is their delight, and they sustain the contest with good humor
for two hours.
     Maverick wears the persona of a gambler who pretends to be a
coward.  The truth of that lighthearted lie is that his gun fairly
jumps out of its holster every time someone crosses him, and he loves
every second of the confrontation.  On the prowl for entry fee money
for the poker sweepstakes in St.  Louis, Maverick sits down to a
small-town card game and meets Annabelle Bransford (Foster), whose good
looks mask her bad intentions.
     Gibson sets the tone in the first scene.  In the classic
catastrophe of the man with his head in a noose, astride a horse about
to turn skittish at approaching rattlesnakes, he begs his animal to
stay "steady, fella, don't move now." Any word or deed of substance
would be ridiculous after that, and, mercifully, none is forthcoming.
     Maverick is uncharacteristically slow to realize that Annabelle is
his match in deviltry, but when he does, their competition becomes the
funny bone of the movie.  Jodie Foster shows a new side of her talent.
Unpredictable, light and subtle, she plays equally well with each of
her leading men.  James Garner, who brought Maverick to the small TV
screen in 1957, deadpans the jokes with the same charm he used all
those years ago.  It's great fun to see him lean into a major role and
steal scenes from his young colleagues.  This is a happy band of
scoundrels.
     Filmed in the glorious country of Utah's Glen Canyon National
Recreation Area, the movie peppers the grand landscape with colorful
characters and ludicrous action.  Powered by jokes and sight gags, the
very thin plot leaves you waiting for the one-liners, and enough of
them come to keep most people happy.  But these spots of genuine fun
just aren't enough to make the whole thing a winner.
     When it starts to drag badly, the colorful finale of the St.
Louis poker game saves the day with a nice assist from James Coburn as
the man who can charge a $25,000 entry fee and still create an
extravaganza.  It is the charm of the principals that carries the
film.  Foster, Gibson and Garner have linked arms, it seems, caught the
script that was thrown them and said, "Let's have fun with this one."
--
Permission is granted free of charge to quote Joan Ellis reviews
for any promotional, editorial, or critical use provided credit
is given: Nebbadoon Syndicate -- JOAN ELLIS
Please send information regarding reuse to 'nebbadoon@telecomp.com'
or 393 Hanover Center Road, Hanover Center, Etna, NH 03750
Tel 603-643-0400, Fax 603-643-0404

Title
Review for Before Sunrise (1995)
     BEFORE SUNRISE is almost terrific.  Filmed with deftness and
delicacy, it catches the essence of young love.  Jesse (Ethan Hawke)
and Celine (Julie Delpy), each alone and unencumbered, meet on a train
as it rolls toward Vienna.  In a burst of spontaneity, they decide to
spend the night together.  Jesse will take the morning plane to
America; Celine will return to Paris.  Between now and then, they have
one night to fall in love.
     The connected strangers stroll the night away on the streets of
the unfamiliar city in a marvelous conversational courtship that is
free of competition and full of trust.  The sweetness of this movie
springs from their quiet resolve to know each other.  We are listening
in on the wondrous process of discovery, and we believe them.
     Jesse's reaction to a riverside poet and an itinerant fortune
teller is purely American: There can't really be anything to this; if I
can't see it, it can't be real.  In lovely contrast, Celine is open
entirely to the romance and fantasy of the moment.  She is full of
quiet charm and mystery, asking questions without needing answers.
     They notice what they happen to see--the Ferris wheel, two actors
on a bridge, a small cemetery--but they don't seek out the sights.
Vienna is merely a backdrop for their wandering.  They are unhurried.
A whole night, after all, is long enough for a good conversation.
     Director Richard Linklater had a mite of courage to think a
two-hour conversational ramble can sustain a movie.  He was right.  By
dawn, the gentle American with the slouchy gait and the quietly saucy
Parisian know what they need to know.
     Neatly avoiding the sentimentality trap, Linklater never lets his
romance turn to sugar.  He does not promise love ever after.  But he
does convince us that 24 hours of love in a country far from home
should be the stuff of universal fantasy.
     Julie Delpy, an actress who can be both wise and innocent, strong
and kind, is the real charmer in this movie.  Her simple sophistication
throws Ethan Hawke into bold relief as a very nice American with a flat
voice; nevertheless he is appealing and vulnerable in his honesty.
Both actors have soaked themselves in their director's mood.  Richard
Linklater has written and directed the film with a light, winsome
touch.  So what's missing?
     If there is no dark side to this tale, there is a bit of an
empty-vessel problem.  At 23, innocence and sweetness go a very long
way, but not quite far enough to make compelling two people who haven't
experienced much of anything.  It would be great fun to see this pair
meet on a European train a couple of decades from now.  But why
quibble?  The romance of a European train and the freedom to say, "Yes,
let's get off and fall in love tonight in Vienna," is irresistible.


Title
Review for Even Cowgirls Get the Blues (1993)
"Even Cowgirls Get the Blues" is Gus Van Sant's vision of
Tom Robbins' counterculture classic. Set to a terrific score by
k.d. lang and Ben Mink, the director and some good performers
labor mightily to capture Robbins' freewheeling version of the
70s. The problem lies right there. It happens sometimes that a
writer can catch the essence of a time in a way that forbids
further tinkering. You have only to listen to Robbins' words on
the soundtrack to know that what is unfolding on the screen can't
catch what he saw. Credit Uma Thurman as Sissy Hankshaw, the
all-thumbs symbolic hitchhiker, Rain Phoenix as Bonanza
Jellybean, her lover, and John Heard for his energy as "The
Countess." And, two decades later, a salute to Robbins for
creating The Rubber Rose Ranch and peopling it with characters of
its time who defy the camera. 


Title
Review for Being Human (1993)
     BEING HUMAN shows us exactly what Robin Williams would be like in
a Valium trance.   It's not that he can't play a timid soul when
asked.  It's just such an awful waste.  Williams is a prodigious talent
with equal facility for comedy or pathos, but here he is playing a
weak, undefined character in an oddly uninteresting set of period
pieces.  So the question becomes just what is writer/director Bill
Forsyth trying to do and why is Robin Williams doing it?  It doesn't
seem like too long a reach to speculate that Williams was intrigued
with Forsyth's idea of tracing a human being being human through
several centuries.  The movie follows Hector as cave man, slave to a
noble Roman, Irishman, shipwrecked gentleman and, finally, contemporary
divorced husband/father.
     You hardly need to connect the dots to find the problem.  It's
very hard to film a popular American movie star as a cave man without
making him look silly.  The voice timbre, the accents, the look of this
movie are contemporary.  However words sounded in the cave culture,
they didn't sound like this.  The error is magnified by an American
narrator who makes flashy little comments about the passing parade and
destroys any possibility of period flavor.  A storyteller she isn't.
     In each of his five lives, Hector is Forsyth's vehicle for
exploring a few of history's driving forces:  courage, cowardice,
greed, love and food.  As coward, Hector falters in indecision as his
wife and children are stolen by invaders.  He runs from an escapee who
needs his help.  He reneges on a promised suicide pact with his noble
Roman and puts himself before his friends in heading for uncertain
rescue on an African beach.
     If he is a coward, he's also a follower.  He vacillates until
others lead him to decision--his cave wife, his master, his priest and
his new age daughter, who leads him through the supermarket, relieving
him of the need to make choices at the food bins.  The poor fellow is
always trying to escape some state of siege, trying to go home without
ever quite making it.  It's a relief to watch him pee silently and
without drama, which seems to work well in all centuries.
     This movie has water, water everywhere: the cave is by the ocean,
and so are the Romans, the Irish, the Portuguese and the Americans.
It's connective tissue, but we never understand the connection.  The
whole thing is less than a noble failure, more than a bad idea.   Bill
Forsyth's view of historical detail is so quirky that nothing works
either as straight drama or as lighthearted comment.  The ground
between the two is silliness, and that's a shame because the actors,
who play many roles each, are very good.  If you are intrigued by the
idea of how a person might pass through the centuries, you may want to
try ORLANDO.


Title
Review for Blue Sky (1994)
     BLUE SKY has an uninspired script enlivened by two extraordinary
actors.  Tommy Lee Jones plays U.S. Army nuclear engineer Hank
Marshall, a man whose flinty, capable exterior melts every time he
looks at his wife Carly (Jessica Lange).  He radiates love and passion
through his eyes and a smile, and we wait hopefully for the smile,
knowing he may, and probably should, head for the door at any moment.
Carly is a handful.
     Jessica Lange's Carly is a stick of dynamite about to blow, a
fragile creature who lives in fantasy to avoid the crushing reality of
being an Army wife. Her volatility is perfect counterpoint to Jones'
moving, subtle performance.  Don't skip this one.
     Hank's insistence that the military make an honest, moral response
to a nuclear accident earns him a transfer from paradisal Hawaii to the
grim nowhere of a military base in Alabama.  Assigned to a filthy
house, Carly takes one look at "this litter box" and flies into a rage
that is rooted in the deeper inner fury at being erased, controlled and
confined by the U.S. Army.  "It's the same as Washington and Germany
and all the other places, only we're ten years older."
     Anyone who ever experienced the tyranny of the Army, a
corporation, a hospital or academia, 1950s style, will recoil.
Director Tony Richardson captures the excruciating feel of the awful
competition that is fostered by an institution with total power over
its own.  Forty years ago, institutionalized erasure was pervasive.
Carly's despair in 1954, Tailhook today.  Score zero on progress for
the patriarchy.
     Richardson uses the early scenes to evoke the awful contrast
between the Hawaiian nirvana and a post at the end of the world.
Striding naked and waist deep in the gentle surf against a brilliant
blue sky, Carly waves her floating scarf in sensual joy and invitation
to the helicopter that hovers above her.  Aboard and looking down
proudly and adoringly is husband Hank.  He revels in her love of the
grand gesture.
     A Roman candle one moment, a pile of ashes the next, Carly
disintegrates in Alabama.  She is every organization woman's worst
nightmare: the one who wins the attention of the boss.  Hank's efforts
at damage control fail, and he has a nearly fatal flaw: he simply
can't resist his wife beyond a sentence or two of reprimand.
     When Hank is hospitalized and drugged by the Army to ensure his
silence, Carly devises a grand gesture that will bring the Army to its
knees.  It is ridiculous and entirely fitting.  Subplots abound, and
all of them showcase the abundant talent of the two leads, who get fine
support from Powers Boothe and Carrie Snodgress as the commanding
officer and his Stepford wife.  Tommy Lee Jones and Jessica Lange lift
the movie beyond its script and deliver a beautifully acted comment on
the staying power of troubled love.


Title
Review for Don Juan DeMarco (1995)
"Don Juan DeMarco" sprinkles fairy dust on the audience, and
in a mere 90 minutes casts a lovely spell. The British did it
with "Enchanted April," and now Jeremy Leven has written and
directed the kind of lighthearted fable that rarely flies free of
Hollywood's heavy hands. If that isn't enough, he has encouraged
his inspired cast to have a good time. They do, and so do we.  
The opening scene is a tone-setting treasure. Don Juan
DeMarco (Johnny Depp), clothed and masked as his mythical hero,
has lost the love of his life and is about to end his own--at 21.
He poses grandly on the ledge of a modern skyscraper, while Dr.
Jack Mickler responds to the emergency, his enormous bulk borne
skyward in the bucket of a giant cherry picker. Marlon Brando,
of course.  
We learn quickly that the inside of Don Juan's head is where
the eminent doctor wants to go. Why on earth would he want to
cure a man who is touched at every turn with romance?  Touch me
if you will, he says, with just a little of your magic. 
In sessions with Jack, Don Juan's wondrous story unfolds,
gathering an irresistible momentum that carries Jack and the
audience into its spell. As he tells his tall tale, huge moons
shine, swords flash and brave men defend beautiful women. As he
listens, Jack bends under the weight of his own envy.   
By now, Jack is bringing bits and pieces of the spirit of
his exotic new patient to his wife Marilyn (Faye Dunaway), who
listens with bemused interest. "I feel we've surrendered our
lives to the momentum of mediocrity," he says of his impending
retirement to their flower-covered house in the suburbs. Little
by little, he takes her hand and they take flight. 
Marilyn smiles on her enormous husband with radiant
affection. He adores her in return and revels in his rediscovery
of her. "I want to hear about your hopes and dreams that got
lost along the way while I was thinking about myself."  She cries
gently and replies, "I thought you'd never ask."  
Brando and Dunaway make pure magic of their scenes. Dunaway
is buoyant and subtle, while the massive Brando moves about with
the lightness of the reborn. Their deep self-assurance allows
them to turn their roles into a romp. They have fun together. At
once electric and playful, their presence fills the screen. They
sparkle.
Johnny Depp is just right as the romantic who has found the
secret to the tedium of life, just right as the poet who can pass
it along to the rest of us.  As Jack says to his colleagues who
insist on dealing with reality, "That's such a limited view of
the situation."   Don Juan's delusion has become Jack's romance,
and for a light and lovely evening, it becomes ours.


Title
Review for Angels in the Outfield (1994)
     Disney has served up one of each of the things it does best for
this summer's younger movie fans and the grownups who love to accompany
them.  ANGELS IN THE OUTFIELD is an unashamed lunge for your
heartstrings, while THE LION KING is an invitation to watch the
extraordinary marriage of computer graphics with human animation.
     ANGELS IN THE OUTFIELD bounces itself off the sure-fire subjects
of redemption, parentless children and snatching victory from the ashes
of defeat.  Roger, a young baseball fan, concocts the dream that his
dad will come home to him if his California Angels can win the
pennant.  Since the Angels are cellar-bound and dad is a dark and
dreary loser who rides his motorcycle with a cigarette dangling from
his lip, the possibility of either dream coming true is close to
zilch.
     But Roger prays, and the real angels hear him.  Flying in
throughout the season at critical moments, they steam a pitch, abort a
homer and supply the general sizzle needed to bring the moribund team
to life.  Coach George Knox (Danny Glover) is nasty in the early
scenes--all the better for his later redemption.
     Roger and his very cute sidekick run their operation from the home
of their warmly wise foster mother, Maggie (Brenda Fricker).  Watch for
another standout performance by Fricker, who manages to seem very real
in the midst of all this emotional manipulation.  The movie is massive,
sentimental overkill, but it's also a no-lose deal for everyone between
three and ten as well for big people who want to believe that an angel
is waiting at their shoulders to offer an assist in a tough situation.


Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
     If circumstances force you to see BATMAN FOREVER, buy some malted
milk balls, slip into your seat, and prepare to plan your taxes or your
summer vacation.  This is a movie that will leave you there, uninvolved,
while it screams forth an explosion of noise and image that has nothing
much to do with anything.
     It would be charitable to dwell on the special effects, like the
surreal rendering of Gotham as a city of glossy stainless steel
cylinders and shafts.  It could also be said that the grotesque makeup
on Two-Face (Tommy Lee Jones) and the Riddler (Jim Carrey) is a
technical achievement and that the cast makes merry with its parts.
But any of that would be an excessive stretch.
     The truth is that this movie is interminably dull and inexcusably
bad.  Just as television news gives viewers mere snippets of events
shown behind the blow-dried hair and taut faces of its anchors, so
"Batman" assaults the audience with empty images.  The invitation,
implicit in the purchase of a movie ticket, to step out of your world
and into someone else's has escaped producer Tim Burton and his staff
completely.  Theirs is a lifeless party.
     See that ball rolling?  See the plunging cylinder?  Where are they
going?  Where did they come from?  You will never know, because the
movie is filmed in such extreme closeup that you can't tell what is
happening.  It's enough, the filmmakers think, to give us a jazzy
montage of fireballs, helicopters, and geometric shapes.  They didn't
waste a minute on building the suspense essential to an action film.
     A two-hour dose of computerized images is intolerably insulting to
an audience waiting to be invited into the fun.  Even if the
determination of the Riddler and Two-Face to unmask Batman is enough of
a premise, we want to be captured.  Scare us, surprise us, make us
laugh!  We want to be horrified at the plunging elevator, intimidated
by a height, frightened by the sea.  Instead we sit, bored and annoyed,
until we, the offended audience, finally shuffle out into the lobby,
angry at a lost night.
     Of the actors, only Michael Gough as Alfred brings a bit of polish
to the mess.  Val Kilmer is adequate as Batman, with metal nipples, but
the poor guy is given not one line or situation that he might infuse
with panache.  A comic strip without a sophisticated light touch is a
dead fish.
     Tommy Lee Jones is game as the psychotic Two-Face, but his part,
without lines or style, is merely a wheel-spinner.  Chris O'Donnell
brings a little dash to Robin, the all-American sidekick, and Jim
Carrey continues to build a career on looking ridiculous in variations
of hair styles and hats.
     Nicole Kidman looks her best, if that helps.  And she delivers the
movie's best line:  "I could write a hell of a paper on a grown man who
dresses like a rodent."   Precisely.  But no one did.


Title
Review for Cold Fever (1994)
      "Cold Fever" is a one-man road movie; it is also a
cross-cultural feast so funny and touching, so eccentric, that we
watch in fascination just to see what can possibly happen next. 
On one level, nothing happens in this movie; on another,
everything does.
     Atsushi Hirata is a successful young Japanese businessman
about to enjoy a golfing vacation in Hawaii.  In short order we
see that he is imprisoned in a world of corporate musts.  He must
make a toast, he must perform, he must do his duty, and finally,
pushed by an elder, he must cancel his vacation in order to
administer burial rites for his parents, who died in an
automobile crash while living in Iceland.  Only he can bring
peace to their spirits.    
     The melancholy young man is lifted by jetliner out of one
culture and deposited in another utterly alien one. The great
beauty of this movie, and its gift to the audience, is the
extraordinary immediacy and strength of the cultures it evokes.  
     Atsushi has chosen to cross the country during the
impossible winter season--by cab, car, horse, and on foot. 
Propelled by obligation, he will allow nothing to keep him from
reaching his goal.  By the time he arrives, we are quite
literally shivering in our seats from watching horizontal sleet
blowing across an already frozen landscape.  
     Thick-coated horses stand in the wind.  Night hovers
continually, lightened only by the ubiquitous whiteness.   Alone
on a one-lane road of rutted ice, Atsushi's few random encounters
are with people who sing--almost in self-defense against the
hostile climate that surrounds them.  They sing in barns, at
funerals, in the backs of trucks as they negotiate a countryside
of white buildings, white water, and white ice. 
     "Does anyone know you are going this way?" asks an ominous
road sign.  Finally, in a bar where the villagers drink "Black
Death," the national sedative," and sing American cowboy songs,
he meets an old man who will guide him on the perilous final leg
of his impossible journey.  The harshness and isolation have
produced an Icelandic Jimmy Stewart.
     Atsushi says very little: "Very strange country; very long
night; very complicated road system."  Not much more than that. 
But he brings great dignity to his quest, and the rituals he
performs for his parents are beautiful.  His search is a majestic
obligation that is the only and very ample thread on which the
filmmakers hang their acute observations of a hostile climate and
the culture created by it.  
     Credit the cross-cultural independent film makers who
imagined this story, and Masatoshi Nagase, who carries it as
Atsushi.  As he says at the end, "Sometimes, the road you take
leads you to a place that's not on any map."  He's right, and it
is a very good trip.      


Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
     Things don't get much better than APOLLO 13.  In the sure hands of
director Ron Howard, several dozen actors hit pure notes in capturing
the essence of the American spirit without being sentimental, mawkish,
or melodramatic.  That's a triumph, considering what might have been
done with the subject of a military program in pursuit of public
relations.
     When John F. Kennedy assumed the burden of playing catch-up with
the Russians by announcing in 1960 that America would put a man on the
moon within a decade, NASA delivered with Neil Armstrong and his crew
in 1969.  By the following year, when Apollo 13 lifts off for follow-up
work on the moon, the feel of anticlimax envelops the mission.  In
crass dismissal of the effort, the networks refuse to cover it.  What
could match last year's feat?
     What more than matches it is a three-pronged probe into the
American psyche.  Jim Lovell (Tom Hanks), Fred Haise (Bill Paxton), and
Jack Swigert (Kevin Bacon) rocket into space on the ill-fated mission
that will suddenly rivet national attention when an oxygen tank
explodes and puts them in jeopardy.  They are trapped in a freezing
tank that is filling slowly with lethal carbon dioxide.
     On the ground, Mission Control struggles to save them. In superb
confirmation of American resourcefulness, Ken Mattingly (Gary Sinise)
and the ground team devise a way to put a square peg in a round hole
with canisters and duct tape that are already aboard the ship.  They
hand the crew a million-to-one solution. Even after Mattingly solves
the oxygen problem, the heat shield and parachutes loom as probable
catastrophes.
     All this unfolds in the early days of the celebrity culture, when
the media begins to hound the victims of catastrophe, sharks to blood,
the worse the better.  It also reveals the paradoxical American
reverence for a single life.  As much as Americans can kill each other
on the highways at the rate of 50,000 a year and shoot each other by
the hundreds in schools, when one life, or three in this case, jumps
into public jeopardy, the collective national psyche heaves up as
savior.
     And they did it by talking simply and directly. These astronauts
would surely have died if their fate had lain in the self-righteous,
self-absorbed verbosity of the 90s. If the images are of puffy space
suits and weightless games, the stuff of it is courage and
resourcefulness.
     The extraordinary rescue is delivered without a false note by
Kevin Bacon, Gary Sinise, Ed Harris, and a fine supporting cast.  Tom
Hanks simply has a direct line into the souls of the characters he
plays. Kathleen Quinlan conveys beautifully the twin mandates of a 60s
woman: support and perform.
     In these talented hands, this tale becomes a real white-knuckler
that manages also to capture the best of our national essence without
waving the flag.  It's moving, and it's good.


Title
Review for Bullets Over Broadway (1994)
     BULLETS OVER BROADWAY is a very funny movie that soars on the
talents of an inspired ensemble cast.  Their success springs in part
from the physical absence of Woody Allen, whose celebrity has become a
distraction.  By staying off screen, he showcases his extraordinary
ways as writer, director, and truth-seer.
     Allen wrings truth from life by spotlighting it with exaggerations
of achingly familiar human behavior.  He enlarges the essence of
things.  When his aspiring artists gather in a Greenwich Village
coffeehouse to dissect the dilemmas of the creative life, they are
universal.  When his characters agonize their ways through life, they
are us.  Allen's double edge is that he shows us ourselves so cleverly
that we squirm while we laugh.
     The movie explodes off the starting block when David Shayne (John
Cusack), a writer of bad plays who believes they are good, gets a shot
at bringing his awful new play to Broadway if he will just compromise
his soul.  Nick (Joe Viterelli) will finance David's play if his
girlfriend, Olive (Jennifer Tilly), is given a substantial supporting
role.  Will David sell out? What's to sell when you have no talent?
     Nick's henchman, Cheech (Chazz Palminteri), will baby-sit Olive
for the run of the play.  Prima donna Helen Sinclair (Dianne Wiest)
will star; and she will try to control everyone who steps into her
reflected glory.  Allen brings the cast together for the first
rehearsal in a hilarious piece of revelation, and when he's finished,
we know the foibles and eccentricities of each of his characters.
     This is a gang of Roaring Twenties-era writers and actors who
operate within the magnetic field of Broadway against a backdrop of
period molls, dolls, and the men who own them.  Gangsters talk about
arson, murder, and revenge as if they were items on a grocery list.
People get bumped off on docks as casually as an employee is
reprimanded by a boss.  It's all cardboard, and it's very funny because
Allen telegraphs his obvious punches with great subtlety.
     Diane Wiest invests Helen with the outrageous behavior of the star
who knows her remaining time in the arena is short.  She toasts "an
ideal world with no compromise" as she and everyone around her bargain
their souls away--except for Cheech, who becomes the noble presence.
He is the hood with a surefire ear for the dialogue of life and an
unshakable determination to protect the integrity of the play he has
made his own.  Chazz Palminteri breezed into view last year in A BRONX
TALE, a movie he wrote, directed, and stole from Robert De Niro.  As
Cheech, his performance is nearly perfect.
     Watching other people mess up can be excruciatingly funny.  The
simplest equations in life are usually complicated only by the tortured
egos of the players, and these players twist themselves into pretzels
trying to make life work.  It's a beautiful example of Woody's pastiche
of crystal-clear contradictions.  It's Woody Allen.


Title
Review for Usual Suspects, The (1995)
     THE USUAL SUSPECTS is confusing, implausible, and very successful.
If that's convoluted, so is the movie.  It shows that a cast with
self-confidence and style can take a plot full of holes and wrap it in
panache.  It doesn't matter a whit that nothing in the movie makes
sense.  Just watching the chaos unfold in the hands of these actors is
reward enough.
     The film opens with a rare moment of clarity as five very literate
felons appear in a police lineup.  Tossed into a communal jail cell,
McManus (Stephen Baldwin), Keaton (Gabriel Byrne), Hockney (Kevin
Pollak), Fenster (Benicio Del Toro), and Verbal Kint (Kevin Spacey)
wonder why the cream of their criminal crop would be rounded up and
impounded together, but proceed anyway to plan an operation so
undefined that is impossible to describe, much less understand.
     There is a lot of dying in this movie, but it's fairly impersonal
because the trigger man usually lurks in the shadows, of which there
are many.  Twenty-seven bodies are laid out on a pier in the opening
scene, and the movie works its way backward from there, trying to
figure out who they are and how they got there.  What we do know is
that the dazzling finale is the illogical outcome of the jail cell
plotting session.
     Over the whole intricate web hangs the spectre of Keyser Soze, an
infamous villain who assumed mythical qualities in the criminal world
after committing some unimaginable symbolic gesture.  The unseen Soze
sends Kobayashi (Pete Postlethwaite), a chillingly cruel emissary, to
our quintet of bandits.  It is Kobayashi who inspires terror the
old-fashioned way:  with cold eyes and words far more powerful than
guns.  Postlethwaite freezes us in our seats with his performance.
     Chazz Palminteri puts his personal stamp on a good cop determined
to untangle the yarn, and the gifted Suzy Amis is on hand as the lawyer
who inspires in Keaton dreams of going straight, but hers is virtually
a non-speaking part.  This is a movie about bad guys doing bad things
with eccentricity and style.  How long has it been since you sat
frozen, watching a hatch lever turning in the belly of a ship, knowing
that the devil himself is on the other side?
     Director Bryan Singer has created the feel of a sophisticated 30s
mystery; Christopher McQuarrie delivers the dialogue in a great mix of
standard four-letter stuff and cerebral criminal thinking; each actor
in this first-rate cast makes his character memorable.  It's a hat
trick.
     From beginning to end, the story is overwhelmed by style.  This
is a time to forget the plot for once and concentrate on enjoying an
actors' field day with a good script.  Newton Thomas Sigel's
photography is wildly sophisticated and works with John Ottman's
ominous score as a real suspense builder.  You may well find delicious
pleasure in being thoroughly caught up in a movie you don't
understand.  Remember, nothing's perfect.


Title
Review for Bad Girls (1994)
     BAD GIRLS is a good idea that is doomed by a terrible script.
There is fun to be had when a dormant genre reemerges in the packaging
of a new era, and the Western is now riding full tilt into the '90s
carrying new sensibilities about women.  Yes, they were there, but what
did they do?
     In this movie, they spring full-blown from the kitchens and beds
of the men they served, hang holsters on their hips and make their way
as ex-hookers bent on a new life.  Four game actresses - Madeleine
Stowe as Cody, Mary Stuart Masterson as Anita, Andie MacDowell as
Eileen and Drew Barrymore as Lilly - struggle with bad lines.  Ready
for a romp, they sink in embarrassment.
     Deciding to start a sawmill ("We sold our bodies, why can't we
sell wood?") on Anita's Oregon homestead land with Cody's life savings,
they trip over various barriers in their effort to flee their desert
surroundings.
     The barriers, which should create the plot but don't, are erected
by Kid Jarrett, Cody's former lover who is supposed to provide the
plot's tension but doesn't.  The Kid (James Russo) is a most
uncharismatic bandit whose sole redeeming characteristic is his open
air desert bedroom featuring a mirrored bureau and a bed draped in
luscious fabric, a sort of outdoor commercial for luxury living right
there in the raunchy, mean Old West.
     The whole state, it seems, is hunting the notorious Kid for reward
money while the truth of it is that the whiny little fellow seems to be
living a short ride from town, presiding over an unimaginably
uninteresting bunch of alcoholic simpletons.  In the manner of old
flames, Cody knows right where to find him when she wants her money
back, which makes the journey seem like a quick trip to the cleaners.
     The establishment townsmen are dressed in suits, the bandits in
dirty laundry and the women in bluejeans and guns - except when, in an
inexplicable genie-like poof, they materialize in glorious dresses.
Their faces carry smudges to indicate hard work.
     The very fine Andie MacDowall is reduced to curling her lip upward
to give us a lingering look at her beautiful smile.  Mary Stuart
Masterson has nothing to do except deliver one nice comment on a
timeless culture:  "I was worthless till I married, I'm worthless as a
widow.  I was worth something as a whore." Drew Barrymore does well by
her action scenes but has nothing to say.  Only Madeleine Stowe is
given a chance to draw a character, and she does it well given
impossible circumstances.
     "Bad Girls" aims for the adventure of "Butch Cassidy and the
Sundance Kid" without understanding the meaning of daring, music or
style.  Still, it did leave me wishing, among other things I've missed
in life, that I might just once have strapped a holster to my hips and
leapt onto a flying horse to escape my enemies.


Title
Review for Vukovar poste restante (1994)
Every now and then a film springs from an awful reality of
the present to sear itself on the conscience of everyone who sees
it. "Vukovar" is one of these. It is the story of two families
caught in the civil war that has destroyed a country and
bewildered the world. 
Filmed entirely on the site of this war's ashes, "Vukovar"
slashes through the headlines with a horrific picture of friends
and acquaintances pitted against each other for reasons buried
deeply in a historic patchwork of ethnic hatreds. With perfect
insight, someone asks, "If each of us has 20,000,000 ancestors,
how is it possible for anyone to think he is of pure extraction?"
The film opens with two families celebrating the marriage of
Toma (Boris Isakovic) and Ana (Mirjana Jokovic) in Vukovar, a
beautiful town of 50,000 by the edge of the Danube. On their
wedding day, a marching throng brings the instant realization
that their world will be shattered. 
"We're no longer fat or thin, or romantic or serious;" Toma
says; "we're either Croats or Serbs."  As with yesterday, today,
and forever, it is a country of innocents caught in a war
fomented by political zealots. 
We in the audience watch as these families lose each other,
and then we watch the absolute destruction of the city and
landscape that was such a part of their being. And we watch the
brutalization of two young mothers who knew joy a short time ago
and now will never know it again. Why is it that war always
bestows this terrible permission on sadists? 
"Vukovar" will stand as one of the most powerful antiwar
films ever made because it takes a stand only against the
intolerable human cost of war. It is a measure of the film's
power and fairness that both the Croatians and the Serbs are
furious at it. It begs the world to fight hatred with truth.
This is a war being fought not with the impersonal
annihilation of modern weaponry, but with machine guns in the
streets. It has the terrible tragedy of intimacy. These are their
streets, their villages, their families. "Vukovar," Ana says,
"has become a graveyard."     
Toma is a deeply good and kind and gentle man--the kind of
soldier who shoots to miss because he can't kill. Ana turns
quickly from a playful young girl in love to a woman whose heart
may as well have been ripped from her body. Superb performances
by these two young actors ensure the strength of this film. 
You may leave the theater still bewildered as to the why of
this war, but you will be in a rage at the fact of it. On some
very deep level, you will be a different person after you see
this film. Once again, a very important independent film has
brought to us truth and reality that scar the soul and stun an
audience to absolute quiet. Please see it.


Title
Review for Age of Innocence, The (1993)
     THE AGE OF INNOCENCE will be one movie for those who loved the
book, and another for those who haven't read it.  Since it is a book
one stumbles over by accident these days, it's a fair assumption that
most people will come to it without demands or expectations.  They will
be rewarded.
     Edith Wharton's New York of the 1870s was an age of manners, codes
and secrets.  It was a world, in her words, whose "harmony could be
shattered by a whisper."  Those who broke the code weren't snubbed, one
character said, they were eradicated.
     Men learned enough law and finance to steer the family ship.  They
married within the branches of New York's family tree and led lives
that were infused by the politics of bloodlines.  It was into this
rigid structure that Wharton dropped Newland Archer, May Welland, and
Countess Ellen Olenska.
     At the moment that Newland announces his engagement to May, Ellen
returns to town from her failed marriage to a Polish Count.  Trying to
shield Ellen from the gossip she has generated, the honorable Newland
immediately falls in love with her.  Ellen, in turn, protects Newland
from himself.  Of May, his innocent wife, Newland remarks "There was no
use trying to emancipate a wife who had no notion that she was not
free."
     The core strength of Wharton's novel is the decency of each of her
protagonists.  Not a villain among them, each responds
characteristically to the suffocating propriety of the society that
controls them.  Martin Scorsese has made an extravagantly beautiful
movie of this world, paying loving attention to the smallest detail,
even when he gets it wrong.  Neither he nor his cast can be faulted,
except, perhaps, by those who love the book.
     Readers, undoubtedly, will wish Scorsese had chosen one of them to
look over his shoulder.  The pace is wrong.  In a world where men "read
law" and women strolled, where gossip was the currency of intimacy, the
pace was studied, movement measured.  A languorous camera might have
evoked the feel of that world, but Scorsese films it in the fast,
clipped rhythms of today.
     It's okay for Winona Ryder's May to be innocent, but surely  she
must be knowing, not naive  She had, after all, been trained for the
job.  Michelle Pfeiffer's Ellen is as honorable as she is written, but
lacks the mystery that made her the one chance Newland had to touch the
things that danced in his imagination.
     Daniel Day-Lewis conveys with great subtlety the gentle
resignation that is Newland Archer's fate.  His suppression of all the
passions forbidden by his culture is unbearably poignant.
     Day-Lewis, Pfeiffer, Ryder and Scorsese make a powerful team that
would be triumphant if Edith Wharton's skill and subtlety weren't so
elusive.  It's a valiant effort that just may introduce a whole new
generation to the book.


Title
Review for Flirt (1995/I)
     "The publicity release for FLIRT sums it up: "FLIRT is the same
story set in three different places and told in three different ways;
an exploration of the universal themes of commitment, betrayal,
indecision, catching a plane, losing a lover, and getting shot in the
face."  That's it.  That's the movie, and that's Hal Hartley.
     He has made an extremely funny and provocative statement about
personal commitment as a global condition, and he has made it in bold,
direct language and colors.  The colors, even in the Tokyo night, are
strong and clear, and the story is presented with stark clarity by
American, German, and Japanese actors in Los Angeles, Berlin, and
Tokyo.  By keeping his script spare, Hartley shines the spotlight on his
chosen themes with an economy of words, the better for us to ponder
them.
     The script is superbly superficial, a wonderfully comic statement
that we humans usually reduce big themes to simple terms.  When we're
surprised, words fail us altogether.  Mired in indecision, Hartley's
characters beg others to make their decisions for them.  They look at
their  dilemmas through a magnifying lens, making each decision far
bigger than it need be, talking each one to death in the absence of
ability to take action.  Maybe the problem will go away, or at least
solve itself.
     Bill (Bill Sage) is comfortable in his lack of commitment to Emily
(Parker Posey).  Maybe there's something better out there, maybe he can
have it all.  In the 90 minutes she gives him to make his commitment to
her as she leaves for Paris, Bill explores his options, gets shot in
the face, and ends up in the hands of the most indecisive emergency
room doctor this side of hell.
     Desperate for help with his decision, Bill finds it in the men's
room from a trio of toilet stall philosophers, who discuss his
situation with hilarious self-absorption.  And so it goes in Berlin,
where a group of construction hard hats addresses Dwight's dilemma with
utter gravity: "To flirt is to exist in ambiguity; we can't exist in
ambiguity forever."  And so it is in Tokyo with Miho, who is jailed for
gun possession and receives wise and comic counsel from a marvelous
trio of cellmates.
     In a world where everyone tries to make decisions of the heart
with reason, love and passion are lost in triviality.  Someone always
asks, "Is there a future for us?"  Can a flirt ever stop wanting more
time or more proof?
     The movie is sharply suggests that we take ourselves far too
seriously, that we reason the love right out of our lives.  It hands us
the comforting remedy of perspective by reminding us, three times over,
that everything we have ever said, done, or thought of doing has been
done a thousand times in our own and other languages.  A flirt is a
flirt is a flirt.


Title
Review for Hackers (1995)
"Hackers" is a landmark movie that has not an ounce of
artistic merit. You will see the worst performance by an actress
in recent memory (Lorraine Bracco as Margo), and you will suffer
a group of unpleasant teenage cretins, who turn, undeservedly,
into unsavory heroes. With an uninteresting script and no plot to
speak of, the movie is one long MTV video set in a computer-
generated landscape.  
Since you will probably not see this film unless you are
sentenced to it, you may wonder why anyone would bother to review
it. It's simple: As grotesque as it is, the film is an
announcement that computer power is passing from nerds to cool
guys, that juvenile hackers are taking over white-collar crime as
surely as street gangs stole neighborhoods. 'Bad Kid' movies have
a way of becoming reality.
Using professional I.D.s like "Zero Cool" and "Razor," this
particular group of young criminals, obsessed with planting
viruses and stealing information, becomes distracted from
everyday crime by an in-house corporate theft that involves Swiss
bank accounts and the possibility of the destruction of oil
tankers, but don't be mislead into thinking these are the
elements of a plot. 
Dade (Jonny Lee Lee Miller) and Kate (Angelina Jolie, in the
single worthy performance), initially seen as petty on-line
thieves, are finally anointed as saviors of the corporation and
the tankers. But the mantle of hero is a very bad fit on these
spoiled, self-indulgent, slovenly, lazy, unsocialized creeps. 
Dressed in various shades of contempo-chic, these
unattractive, wild-eyed high school kids argue over french fries
and ride their roller blades through computerized circuit boards
that morph into cities as fast as a mouse can click. 
Pulling floppy disks from their pockets as crisply as street
kids pull guns, the hackers know that their ability to manipulate
information will allow them to tamper with the infrastructure and
security of the country. The ability to create havoc is a far
headier experience for them than the sex, drugs, or alcohol that
fueled kid cultures of the past. As a path to power, the laptop
makes guns seem almost quaint. 
As bad as it is, the movie is a real echo of the headlines
that have trumpeted the first convictions of hackers who have
already broken into bank accounts and vital statistics. It is not
a stretch to imagine what they could do to airborne planes and
military orders. 
As a landmark, this very bad movie is probably the first
drop from a ruptured pipe that will become a torrent of movies
about the ingenious ways criminals devise to upset society in an
explosion of computer crime. 
Let's hope some towering figures emerge to lead the film
parade that will chronicle this new turf. May they have in their
human brains the imagination and talent to create suspense and
strong characters who move through good plots. May they also be
wise enough to hire good actors.  


Title
Review for Nine Months (1995)
     NINE MONTHS is certainly the longest pregnancy I have ever
experienced.  It is a very silly movie.  Whether it is also funny will
depend on you.
     Pregnant Becca (Julianne Moore) is stranded in the current
stereotype of the young woman who lives with a man she loves in an
arrangement that includes hard work and fun, but not marriage or, God
forbid, children.  Why would the "he" of this movie want responsibility
or commitment when the woman of his dreams is already in his bed, and a
red Porsche and San Francisco Bay are immediately outside the window of
his perfect apartment?
     When Becca decides her clock is ticking, she has a tough
conversion on her hands in the person of her lover, Samuel, who is
played--dare I say the words--by Hugh Grant.  For one hour and
forty-two minutes we watch Hugh pout, growl, and overact.  It would be
nice to think he is trying to lift the movie upward, but it is remotely
possible that he thinks the audience just can't get enough of him.  So
overdone is his mugging that the pregnant woman becomes the movie's
brightest spot.  Actress Julianne Moore is a very appealing actress and
has all the right reactions to the ludicrous chaos that surrounds her.
     On their first visit to the delivering O.B., Becca and Samuel run
smack into Dr.  Kosevich (Robin Williams), a newly arrived Russian
veterinarian who has recently decided to switch his specialty to
babies.  Williams causes a lot of spontaneous laughter with his
malapropisms.  He calls for "Anastasia" to anesthetize and discusses
Becca's "Volvo" with gentle discretion.
     Williams is very funny here, but he carries the rest of the cast
straight into the familiar spectacle of Americans falling from farce to
slapstick whenever they try a British specialty.  The whole silly thing
dissolves finally into a hospital scene full of enough fuzzy love to
please Newt and the whole of America's heartland.  This might have been
a romantic comedy or a zany farce, but no one made the choice, so we
have a little of everything and a whole lot of nothing.
     And then there's the "incident."  Although there can't be many
Americans who would be shocked by a celebrity indulging in one-stop
shopping, it may not be what people most want from the charming,
awkward bumbler they had come to love in FOUR WEDDINGS AND A FUNERAL.
The box office will tell whether the laughter that rocks the theater at
the sight of his face is derisive or affectionate.  It hardly matters;
the movie is still a bust.
     Let's not blame the whole thing on Hugh Grant.  Writer/director
Chris Columbus has the distinction of creating three of the most
intolerable movies ever made: MRS. DOUBTFIRE and those violent assaults
on sensibility, the HOME ALONEs.  NINE MONTHS is not as excruciatingly
bad as the others.  Let's assume Columbus is in a lull.


Title
Review for Nixon (1995)
"Nixon" is the best and worst of Oliver Stone. If it is an
interesting chronicle of America's cardinal political scandal, it
still smacks of a researcher so proud of his work that he can't
bear to leave anything out. It's too damned long.       
>From his White House bunker, Nixon tries to snuff out the
Watergate brush fire by jettisoning his advisors in ascending
order of importance. First, the break-in team:  Hunt, Liddy,
McCord, Martinez, Sturgis; next, White House staffers Erlichman,
Haldeman, and Dean; then friend and attorney-general John
Mitchell. 
At the end, he is surrounded by players from the bench: the
inept Ron Ziegler, the ambitious Al Haig, and the infamous Henry
Kissinger, who can barely contain his glee at the possibility of
being the hero who saves the country from a sick man. In the
"Deep Throat" guessing game, it's worth noting that Kissinger is
the one figure who needed two decades of secrecy in order to
continue his career as international power broker.   
The facts of Watergate were proven long ago and confirmed
repeatedly by the testimony of the participants, leaving little
for Oliver Stone to posit or prove. A sitting president committed
at least 39 felonies, orchestrated a cover-up, lied profoundly,
and taped himself in the act. When the Supreme Court ruled 8-0
that the president could not use executive privilege in a
criminal case, the game was over. 
Reaching for a purpose for his film, Stone decides to
explore and explain Richard Nixon. He paints his portraits in the
emotional, questionable brush strokes of psychohistory. Did Nixon
really fuel himself with scotch?  Was his Quaker mother so devout
that she defused all human emotion by hiding behind the cloak of
her faith?  Is it fair to hypothesize about the intimacy of the
Nixon bedroom?
Stone tells us that the slights and snubs of childhood
produced the paranoid star of the Watergate tapes. In the final
hour, he hammers his point home by cutting his camera wildly
through Nixon's visions in flailing excess that threatens to
overwhelm the stark truth. This is melodrama where none is
needed.   
Anthony Hopkins, with his head seeming to grow from
somewhere in his chest, catches the awkward stance and tension
that informed Nixon's behavior. He has captured perfectly the
sudden smile that burst from a dark scowl under pressure.
Supported all the way by a strong cast, Hopkins turns in a
performance that is an uncanny suggestion of Nixon's core. 
As Nixon's wife, Joan Allen is every bit as enigmatic as the
real Pat Nixon. She conveys beautifully the sense of the
claustrophobic prison that surrounds her. The actress's
compassion for Mrs. Nixon is palpable.
The drama of peeling away the layers of guilt until Nixon
stands exposed needs no embellishment. At the end of his tortured
farewell speech, he stands naked before the nation, fake to the
end, riveting in his transparency. This is one story that did not
need Oliver Stone.  


Title
Review for Crooklyn (1994)
"Crooklyn" is a startling departure for Spike Lee. His
earlier work has been a primal scream that forces us, from
whatever perspective we inhabit, to recognize the rage around us.
He has explored the problems of class, race, and gender while
shooting from all angles at persistent myths and stereotypes.  
This movie is a breather, a moment of reprieve and reflection for
a front-line warrior. With his brother and sister he has made a
collective reminiscence that is surprisingly gentle for a man who
has his finger on the pulse of contemporary anger. 
In Crooklyn, children invent variations on the games of
urban childhood, which fit the confines of the stoops that are
the boundaries of their lives. They rag each other mercilessly,
but they are safe. There is no violence on Spike Lee's block.  
They may be safe, but they are not quiet. The movie is a
mad, marvelous verbal war, an uninterrupted battle of comic
insults, and it starts with a grandiloquent verbal explosion. 
Carolyn Carmichael (Alfre Woodard) commands her five children to
have the kitchen spotless by bedtime. When she returns at four
a.m. to sloth and slop, she routs every last one of them out of
bed in the middle of the night, lines them up against the wall,
and delivers her lecture. She's Patton at Bastogne, spewing
bombast at her children, who are corporals in this mom's army. 
Getting the troops to eat right is a lost cause. The dinner
table establishes the rhythm for the entire movie: 
conversational combat without pause. The trouble always starts
with a minor clash and escalates to the full boil perfect pitch
of the Carmichaels' dialogue. This family argues to a rap
rhythm. Insult is the language of love.
Dad is a blues musician in eclipse. Unnoticed in the shadow
of rock, he is sure the sun will shine on his music again, but he
feels very sorry for himself as he waits. Cradling his
children's heads in his huge, gentle hands, Woody (Delroy Lindo)
gives them love as their anchor. Meanwhile, Mom carries the load
and gradually begins to buckle under the weight of it. As Woody
and Carolyn, Delroy Lindo and Alfre Woodard are a deeply touching
pair. Woodard may be the only actress around who can look
stunning full-time as a mother of five and make it seem real.  
On the downside, the movie is overlong because it lacks focus. 
Lee is a provocateur, not a storyteller. Once he has painted the
culture of his family and their block, he has no place to go. In
a burst of self-indulgent temper, he sends Troy, the eldest
daughter, off to visit relatives in an appallingly sterile
version of southern suburbia. Slap, slap, Suburbia, take that.
This movie is about the author's nostalgia, and Spike Lee's
nostalgia turns everything shimmery right. It's his childhood,
and don't let anybody mess with how he remembers it. On most
counts, his memory is our reward.  


Title
Review for Circle of Friends (1995)
     CIRCLE OF FRIENDS is a pretty picture about appealing people in a
lovely landscape, but not one surprise lies on its predictable path.
It's a wonder the audience didn't let out a collective shriek,
"Surprise me, please!"
     Actress Minnie Driver is delightful as Benny, the spunky young
girl who takes the daily bus from her country town to the university in
Dublin.  At first sight, plain Benny falls for Jack (Chris O'Donnell)
the reigning rugby jock who, to his everlasting credit, sees her real
spirit. "You really know yourself, don't you, Benny?" Jack asks. "Yes,
I do," she replies.
     Up to this point we have met Benny's protective parents, her
friends Eve and Nan, and enough of the bare Irish countryside to warm
the heart of a minimalist.  It can't go wrong, we think, and then it
does.  Hooked by a budding romance and the lilting Irish rhythms, we
wait interminably for the movie to live up to its good beginning, and
it never does.
     The truth is, we have been dropped into a soap opera.  Can a plain
little girl from a little country town find happiness with Dublin's
reigning rugby star?  In this circle of friends, will we have to worry
about rape, betrayal, a pregnancy, an accident?  Can Benny count on the
loyalty of Eve and Nan?  Like the soap it is, the movie dangles these
questions  before us, and when the answers come, they are so
predictable that all dramatic tension drains from the screen.
     And that's a shame when the central performance by Minnie Driver
is so strong.  With a ready smile, natural enthusiasm and open
curiosity, she makes Benny vulnerable, but with a sense of herself so
sure, that vulnerability never does her in.  Bennie suffers whenever
she is squeezed into the artifice of college life or a too-tight dance
dress, but she becomes a sparkling package of wit, loyalty and decency
whenever she is in a meadow with Jack or chattering with her good
friend Eve.
     Even Driver can't lift the picture out of the hackneyed dilemmas
of the 1950s.  It was a time when pre-marital pregnancy carried
consequences beyond the understanding of today's young people, a time
when the loss of a boyfriend meant being trapped at home until another
could be snagged.  These kinds of problems seem ludicrous in the 1990s.
     I wondered for a few moments if this might be a spoof on those
times, but it isn't.  Then I considered the possibility that it might
be an affectionate, if misguided attempt to capture the "flavor" of the
1950s.  Alas, it is neither.  It's a sudser, nothing more.
     If you are charmed by Ireland, think about going instead or also
to THE SECRET OF ROAN INISH, a small jewel of a film that captures
the extraordinary ability of the Irish to tell a story.  A good story
is something that eluded entirely the makers of CIRCLE OF FRIENDS.


Title
Review for Shawshank Redemption, The (1994)
     If THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION sentences the audience to an
excessively long jail term, the very good news is that the long stay is
rewarded with first rate acting.  Just as you begin to long for a
fast-forward button for this masterful creation of the terrible tedium
of prison life, Director Frank Darabont turns his story into a fine
fairy tale.
     Opening ominously with Andy Dufresne (Tim Robbins) loading a gun
as the Ink Spots croon "If I Didn't Care" on the tape deck in his car,
the movie is driven for its full long length by Tim Robbins' portrait
of a man sentenced for murder to two life terms in Maine's Shawshank
prison.  Robbins' exceptional performance is matched every step of the
way by Morgan Freeman as Red, the prison's procurer of all contraband.
Another lifer, Red has served twenty years with a dignity and humor
that have turned him into Shawshank's elder statesman.  Red and Andy
share a value system that is rooted in restraint.
     It is 1947 and Andy, an eager, bright vice president of a Portland
bank, arrives at Shawshank to spend the rest of his life in a cell.
After enduring the beatings and sexual assaults accorded newcomers, he
settles into the monotony of life without hope.  It is a routine of
brutal explosions alternating with spirit-crushing boredom, and we are
made to feel every second of it.
     The enigmatic face Andy turns to his fellow prisoners gives no
clue to an inner plan.  He gradually uses his banking talents to become
the estate planner for the entire prison staff, including the sadistic
Warden, who is a Bible-quoting, tub-thumping, Christian hypocrite.
Andy quietly becomes indispensable and acquires the essential
ingredient of success: access.  Number 37927 does have a plan after
all.
     Watch for the sublime moment when Andy locks himself in the
communications room and pipes the duet from "The Marriage of Figaro"
into the prison yard.  Mozart stills the place with awe.  With the
exception of Bob Gunton, whose maniacal Warden crosses into caricature,
the cast is uniformly excellent and benefits, as any cast does, from
the presence of Morgan Freeman.  If there is a flaw in his role as
written, it is that his grace and dignity don't prepare us for the
fanciful turn the movie takes toward the end, when it becomes a fairy
tale, whose subtle clues were there all along.
     This welcome flight into the imagination adds lightness to earlier
improbabilities.  Andy and Red had sprung into this world and out of
it, it seems, without family or friends to root for them on the
outside.  And then, there's the matter of Andy's tastes.  How many
young bankers do you know who love opera, chess, the Bible, and
alabaster? These reservations, on reflection, reveal one reviewer who
was late in understanding the feathery notes that lift the movie out of
despair and touch it with hope.


Title
Review for Up Close & Personal (1996)
"Up Close and Personal" is the movie critics love to hate.
Apparently, it is also a movie audiences love to see. Certainly
the negative reviews didn't bring 14,000,000 people to the
theaters in the first week alone. That's pretty good for a movie
that has been generally panned. 
Perhaps this is yet another signal that Americans are sick
of Hollywood's obsession with violence. This movie, along with
"Mr. Holland's Opus," has given them a way to express their
impatience. "Up Close" is an old-fashioned romance, a spiritual
descendent of Hollywood's Golden Age, when movies had a hero and
heroine, and audiences spent two hours hoping they would get
together.
When someone dies in this movie, it happens quickly and
cleanly, so the audience is affected by the loss of the human
being rather than the now standard barrage of graphic violence.
We are given time to care about the people we are getting to
know. And that's the real key:  we actually have a story here.
Tally Atwater (Michelle Pfeiffer), an ambitious blond who
has waited tables and dealt craps in her hometown of Las Vegas,
brings that questionable experience to her new job at Channel 9,
Miami. Her boss, Warren Justice (Robert Redford), is a fallen
Washington press corps hero exiled to the hinterland.  Warren
knows smart when he sees it, so he teaches Tally the rules of the
trade while he falls in love with her.
Their courtship takes place on the causeways, balconies,
rowboats, and beaches of Miami and the Keys. Their other life
takes place in the television studios, where Warren recognizes
and encourages Tally's determination to break onto the "A" team.
It is Warren who finally convinces her to tell viewers the truth
instead of the pablum that station bosses concoct for their
listening pleasure. 
That's a romantic notion, isn't it? An Edward R. Murrow
view of a newsman's role, so out of date today that just being
reminded of it brings a certain nostalgic pride that once upon a
time such people roamed the globe looking for the truth of a
situation. This movie is shot through with that kind of thing-- 
principles and constancy.
Michelle Pfeiffer gives Tally both raw ambition and the
sense to listen to Warren when he sends her toward--dare I say
it?--the truth and integrity of real reporting vs. the ugly path
to being a blow-dried anchor. Robert Redford makes Warren a
little seedy, very understated, with a core of values wrapped in
steel.   
Remember that Warner Bros. released "Casablanca" as a B-
picture whose unexpected legend derives from romance and
integrity. O.K., this isn't "Casablanca," but its two icons have
the same kind of firepower. Robert Redford and Michelle Pfeiffer
know how to make love the old-fashioned way--with their eyes and
their smiles as well as in bed. Have we all become too cynical to
enjoy a stylish, romantic story that turns on the intelligence
and sparkle of two very appealing actors?   


Title
Review for Birdcage, The (1996)
"The Birdcage" is showing its age. This latest take on "La
Cage aux Folles" is curiously flat in spite of the very big
talents of Robin Williams, Nathan Lane, Gene Hackman, and Dianne
Wiest. Elaine May and Mike Nichols have teamed up to update the
dialogue and direction. Cast and production team just couldn't be
better--so what's wrong?
Start with the story. Armand (Robin Williams) and Albert
(Nathan Lane) have raised Val (Dan Futterman), Armand's son by
his one experience with a woman 20 years back. Now Val has
announced the unthinkable: he is going to marry a girl, and the
girl is the daughter of Senator and Mrs. Keely. 
The senator, a giant in "The Coalition for Moral Order," has 
recently announced his support for presidential candidate Eli
Jackson, who has just been found dead in the bed of a black
prostitute who heard her customer's last words: "Your money's on
the dresser, Chocolate." The senator and his wife bring along an
appropriate load of anxiety when they arrive in South Beach to
meet the parents of their daughter's intended. Will Val's parents
be put off by Keely's embarrassing endorsement of a fallen leader
of "family values?"
In South Beach, meanwhile, Armand is staging an elaborate
charade for his son. To create a mainstream family, he enlists
Val's mother Katherine (Christine Baranski) to play her real role
and tries unsuccessfully to hide Albert, who refuses to be left
out of the proceedings. 
The earlier film and stage play did all this with a grand
blend of hilarity and pathos. In 1996, the assumptions seem all
wrong. The decade has given us state-of-the-moment drag films
("Priscilla, Queen of the Desert," "Paris is Burning") that
advanced public understanding of the transvestite culture.
Watching Albert try to walk like John Wayne and keep a stiff
wrist is a little like watching Butterfly McQueen play Prissy in
"Gone With the Wind." The world has moved beyond the
stereotype--a little, at least. 
Robin Williams responds by playing Armand with quiet
dignity. Dianne Wiest and Gene Hackman have a field day
straight-facing the Moral Coalition couple that Elaine May
created to bring the story into the 90s. Mr. Hackman, just by
mouthing right-wing pieties without embellishment, pierces the
skin of the hypocrisy. Christine Baranski jumps into the pretense
with high spirits, only to stand mute when her role is dropped.
Nathan Lane's caricature performance is part of the problem.
Topical it may be, but the warmth is gone. There isn't a
scintilla of evidence of real affection between Armand and
Albert, no feel of their love for Val or his for them. The film
is powered only by the desperate need to fool the Keelys. Asking
too much? Perhaps. But if this modernized, brittle version of "La
Cage" is very funny, it is also without heart. On the road to
topical comedy, it lost its power to be affecting.     


Title
Review for Primal Fear (1996)
You won't find "Primal Fear" on the "recommended" list of
the Catholic Church. The film's premise is a karate chop to the
gut of churchly piety, but it's a bold premise strengthened by
good acting and crisp dialogue. It even offers a breath-catching
moment that draws a collective gasp from the audience--suspense,
the old-fashioned way. 
The opening scenes are Paramount's entry in this year's
sweepstakes of graphic gore--unnecessary, as always, and never
carrying the wallop of a good line or image. Surely there's a
better way to establish a crime than showing a victim with 78
stab wounds and a six-digit number carved on his chest.  
Martin Vale (Richard Gere) is a defense attorney whose
adrenaline rushes at the first news of an indefensible criminal.
Aaron Stampler (Edward Norton) is a 19-year-old suspect in the
grizzly, hands-over-the-eyes murder of Chicago's Archbishop.
Altar boy, soft-spoken southern lad with a disarming stutter,
covered with the Archbishop's blood, Aaron is an irresistible
magnet for Martin, who can hardly get to him fast enough. 
"I'm your mother, your father, your priest," Martin tells
the boy. "I don't want you talking to anyone but me." He doesn't,
and thereby hangs the tale. Martin's courtroom opponent in this
game he loves is Janet Venable (Laura Linney), his former lover
and colleague in the prosecutor's office. She is nearly his equal
in courtroom strategy, certainly his peer in conversational
poison darts. 
Martin, who professes not to care a whit whether a client is
innocent or guilty, now has one with no prior record and no
apparent motive--a situation that is a serious challenge to his
cynicism. In spite of himself, he begins to dig down through the
layers to determine whether his client is innocent or whether he
is evil wrapped in the body of a boy scout. When this movie
drags, we know it is marching toward something big, even with
weights on its feet.
The trial unfolds as the now standard media circus. Boom
mikes, anchors, and reporters stake out the courthouse. Sound
familiar? But Martin, it turns out, has a little more soul than
Johnnie Cochran. Richard Gere is unexpectedly effective in making
a very interesting character of the cynic we thought we had
figured out.  
Laura Linney is very good as the fast-talking but vulnerable
prosecutor. Andre Braugher is sharp and funny as Tommy, Martin's
lead investigator. Alfre Woodard lends her dignity to the role of
the judge, who has become jaded now that her intelligence has
been confirmed by power. Edward Norton, in his first movie role,
is simply terrific as the suspect. 
The audience gasps and groans in the grip of a good
old-fashioned courtroom melodrama that is based not so much on
the rules of evidence as on the new rules of celebrity. It's a
good story with a grand villain and a fine portrait by Richard
Gere of the loneliness of the long-distance defense attorney.


Title
Review for Net, The (1995)
     Although THE NET sells itself as a hip thriller and master of the
Internet, it is really just warmed over soup. It has none of the charm
or eye-popping wonder of JUMPIN' JACK FLASH, by which even the ignorant
among us were held in thrall to the mystery that unfolded on the then
unfamiliar monitor.
     We wait longingly to be pulled into the excitement, to care about
the people and the cause, but director Irwin Winkler cannot make a
thriller of a script full of holes. Midway, we know we've been taken.
It's just a recycled chase film with Cyberspace aspirations. The
filmmakers are telling us that something diabolically clever is going
on on-screen, but we are unworthy of knowing the details.
     Maybe it's not quite that bad. Sandra Bullock makes a fine heroine
of Angela, a computer expert whose specialty is fixing other people's
systems. She's a solid presence to be trusted, a vulnerable person we
can root for. Somewhere out there, in a clever program called "Mozart's
Ghost," she tangles with "The Iceman," a cold, smart hacker who stays
one step ahead of Angela throughout the confusion.
     The Iceman, a.k.a. Jack Devlin, is an old-fashioned stalker with
newfangled weapons. The battlefield is familiar:  the open sea, dark
stair wells, a crowded convention floor with a villain on the loose.
The centerpiece, of course, is the endangered woman. Instead of the
secret codes or microfilms of yore, it's a disk that she guards.
     Jack wants that disk, and to get it, he erases Angela's identity
both on the computer and in the real world. It's a good premise, the
worst extension of our fears of the computer world.  During all this we
begin to understand that national security is somehow just as
endangered as Angela. Bring us in, Irwin Winkler!  But he doesn't. The
stakes are high, but what are they?
     When an audience isn't made part of the game, everything on-screen
turns dull. This is a flat and lazy movie. Can you believe you will see
yet another car approach a yawning drawbridge, another chase through a
whirling merry-go-ground?
     Watching Angela order pizza by computer while she solves software
dilemmas to a good musical score is a promising beginning. But Jack,
while properly scary in his evil, is a stalker whose footsteps we fear
without knowing why he hates our heroine. Sandra Bullock and Jeremy
Northam are let down badly by their scriptwriters and director, who set
them adrift in the debris of an undefined plot.
     Although there is periodic suspense, how can we be really scared
when we don't understand the enemy?  The unfrocking of the mastermind
in the final frames carries no punch because we never wondered who he
was in the first place. By now you must be asking about the cause of
all the murder and mayhem. What was on that crucial disk?  We still
don't know, and that's the problem.


Title
Review for Clueless (1995)
     Thanks to a bright young cast and a stylish production, CLUELESS
jumps off the screen with improbable gaiety.  Director/writer Amy
Heckerling has managed to make good fun with the spoiled young rich of
Bronson Alcott High School in Beverly Hills. Alicia Silverstone strides
through this unpromising landscape with an engagingly upbeat,
unselfconscious performance as Cher, a kind-hearted teenager who
computerizes her wardrobe.
     She is a 16-year-old ray of light offering momentary reprieve from
the current deluge of movies devoted to the dark side of adolescence,
in a self- punishing diet of crime, drugs, sex, and shock.  If she
drives her own white Jeep Wrangler and uses a cellular phone the way
other teenagers have used lipstick and the old family car, it is
endearing rather than repulsive.  Why?
     Because the core of the story is rooted in protective affection--a
steady, permanent stream of it between father and daughter. Such
familial love seems alien. Conditioned by screen violence, we watch
CLUELESS with one eye cocked for some inevitable ax to fall, for the
comeuppance to be delivered.  When the suspicion finally dissolves, a
kind of frothy bubble bath of appreciation envelops the audience. It's
O.K. to laugh after all.
     Cher (Alicia Silverstone) lives in a world where the abundance of
money fuels a comical culture of plenty. The refrigerator is full of
trays of impeccably ready sandwich makings, and a day can be summed up
by "I broke in my purple clogs."  Phone numbers are "digits," houses
are outlandish pretensions, gas fireplaces are ignited with electronic
zappers--and all of it is wrapped in enthusiasm.
     Cher floats through all this as a one-woman band of good
intentions, which take the form of makeovers for the needy, matchmaking
for the lonely, and caretaking for her widowed father (Dan Hedaya).
Even that's a switch.  Although Dad is a driven litigator, he is home,
preparing an important case that only partly hides his affectionate
concern for his goofy daughter.
     This dad knows his daughter will negotiate perfectly the Cadillac
culture that surrounds her, and, after a while, we know he's right.
Expensive toys and tastes are mere incidentals to Cher and her friends.
Whatever drugs or alcohol they allow themselves is reserved for
parties. It's almost a replay of the pecking order politics of the 50s,
without the meanness of spirit that infects our time.
     Lurking in the background with handsome cuddliness is the solution
to Cher's distaste for high school boys: budding lawyer Josh (Paul
Rudd) is falling in love with the eccentric goofball who is his
step-sister. Josh waits patiently for Cher to get serious, and when he
realizes that, within her own parameters, she already is, he's a
goner.
     We don't spend a second worrying about Cher's past or future.
Wondering what she will do next is as challenging as this movie gets.
What she does next is usually very funny. Watch out, Grunge: here comes
the return of Mod.
For all Ellis reviews, see http://movie.infocom.net (which has a search engine)
or send any email to: movie@telecomp.com
Feel free to reuse as long as source acknowledged.
Please send information regarding reuse to 'nebbadoon@telecomp.com'

Title
Review for Brothers McMullen, The (1995)
     Sin hangs inevitably and wonderfully over THE BROTHERS MCMULLEN.
Raised in a Catholic Church that still clings with bloody fingernails
to dictates that contradict human nature, the brothers ponder the
forbidden sins of premarital sex, birth control, abortion, and
masturbation--and then get right on with it.  The funny bone of this
movie is soaked in the guilt each brother carries as he indulges
himself.
     The three brothers McMullen have been raised by Mom and the Church
in the grand tradition of Irish Catholic duality.  In a superb opening
scene at the graveside of her newly dead husband, Mrs.  McMullen
announces to her son Barry (Edward Burns) that now that the rotter is
dead, she is leaving immediately for Ireland to return to a man she has
loved for 35 years.
     Perhaps an overdeveloped sense of duty is the only explanation for
staying for over three decades with an alcoholic tyrant who abused his
family.  But stay she did, and she taught her sons about the
inconvenient values of duty and fidelity.  The opening scene alone is a
real winner for Edward Burns, who wrote, directed, and starred in this
lively story of young people struggling with falling in love.
     The downside to this fine effort includes rough edges and obvious
editing, as well as young actors who lapse often into ordinariness,
exhausted by their grand effort.  If the movie is uneven, it is still a
home run for rookie Edward Burns.  Burns, Mike McGlone, Jack Mulcahy,
and "their women" win credit for a light evening that rivals the rest
of the Multiplex summer menu.
     Patrick, the dedicated idealist, suffers mightily.  "Hey, I don't
need any new ideas, I'm confused enough already."  Jack, after five
years of idyllic marriage to Molly, is still not ready for the children
his lovely wife wants.  Barry, the writer, flees at the first
suggestion of commitment.  "I wasn't ready to move out of my dorm," he
moans.  Lost without a woman, he's angry that they "peel away men's
protective coating and then slice them up."
     "You can't be a Catholic and have a healthy sex life," and
afterward, "I'm going to hell," are pithy comments from young men
tussling with churchly teachings and the demands of their modern
partners.  When Molly says, "We grow accustomed to things and just look
right past them," we know it's a concept covered with dust.  Women
don't look past things so easily anymore.
     "There are certain rules, and you gotta live by them," says a
brother who knows better.  This movie is a playful romp in an Irish
Catholic family whose men have an aversion to permanence, a dread at
the very thought of not experiencing the wonderful world of women
forever.  The brothers McMullen have a bucketful of charm and about
five years of fidelity for the women they love.  All for $20,000.  Take
that, Hollywood.


Title
Review for Smoke (1995)
     SMOKE is a small jewel nestled in a field of rocks.  Paul Auster's
beautiful set of interlocking stories is directed with affecting
subtlety by Wayne Wang and acted by a notable cast that creates an
extraordinary feeling of life as it is really lived.
     Auggie (Harvey Keitel) presides with humility over the cigar shop
that has become a small culture within the Brooklyn neighborhood that
surrounds it.  At the moment we join them, writer Paul Benjamin
(William Hurt) is expounding on the subject of how to weigh smoke--a
conversational contribution both weightless and typical of the
atmosphere that draws the regulars.  Chatter is the medium of their
connection.
     The smoke shop offers its customers both diversion and
friendship.  It is there that all the stories connect:  Augie and Bill,
Bill and Rashid, Augie and Ruby, Bill and April.  They walk through
each other's lives with gentle manners and decent intentions.  Each, in
some particular way of his own, takes care of the other.  Each gives a
gift that changes another's life.
     The tone is set early on by a sublime scene that shakes the
audience by the shoulders and says, "If you want to understand this
film, slow down and listen."  Augie's real life, it turns out, lies in
the 4000 pictures he has taken over the years at precisely 8:00 a.m. at
the corner of 3rd Street and 7th Avenue.  On the night he shows his
albums to Bill, Bill responds, "They're all the same."  Only when Augie
urges him to really look, does Bill slow down enough to see that his
friend's life's work has been to capture the life of the corner outside
his shop.
     In 4000 photographs of the same spot, Augie shows him how to tell
the seasons from the way the light hits the earth, how to tell the
weather from the clothes people are wearing.  In a metaphor for the
film itself, Bill finally sinks peacefully into the process just as we
sink slowly into the unusual rhythm of the story.  It is a tale of
unarticulated caring, and by the end of it, we know everyone very
well.
     This is a story not of events but of daily life.  A son searches
for his father; a man does a good Christmas deed; an ex-wife turns up
after 18 years.  All of this pedestrian stuff passes, somehow, through
the orbit of Augie, who makes people feel good without their ever
knowing he is doing it.  As a matter of fact, even Augie doesn't know
he's doing it.
     The players in this graceful movie are all, it seems, in thrall to
the mood of author Auster and director Wang.  Harvey Keitel, William
Hurt, Forest Whitaker, Stockard Channing, and Harold Perrineau Jr. take
great care not to strike a loud note in this gentle movie.  This is
what real actors do when a good writer hands them a fine script.


Title
Review for Flirt (1995/I)
"The publicity release for "Flirt" sums it up: " 'Flirt' is
the same story set in three different places and told in three
different ways; an exploration of the universal themes of
commitment, betrayal, indecision, catching a plane, losing a
lover, and getting shot in the face."  That's it. That's the
movie, and that's Hal Hartley.
He has made an extremely funny and provocative statement
about personal commitment as a global condition, and he has made
it in bold, direct language and colors. The colors, even in the
Tokyo night, are strong and clear, and the story is presented
with stark clarity by American, German, and Japanese actors in
Los Angeles, Berlin, and Tokyo. By keeping his script spare,
Hartley shines the spotlight on his chosen themes with an economy
of words, the better for us to ponder them.
The script is superbly superficial, a wonderfully comic
statement that we humans usually reduce big themes to simple
terms. When we're surprised, words fail us altogether. Mired in
indecision, Hartley's characters beg others to make their
decisions for them. They look at their  dilemmas through a
magnifying lens, making each decision far bigger than it need be,
talking each one to death in the absence of ability to take
action. Maybe the problem will go away, or at least solve itself.
Bill (Bill Sage) is comfortable in his lack of commitment
to Emily (Parker Posey). Maybe there's something better out
there, maybe he can have it all. In the 90 minutes she gives him
to make his commitment to her as she leaves for Paris, Bill
explores his options, gets shot in the face, and ends up in the
hands of the most indecisive emergency room doctor this side of
hell. 
Desperate for help with his decision, Bill finds it in the
men's room from a trio of toilet stall philosophers, who discuss
his situation with hilarious self-absorption. And so it goes in
Berlin, where a group of construction hard hats addresses
Dwight's dilemma with utter gravity: "To flirt is to exist in
ambiguity; we can't exist in ambiguity forever."  And so it is in
Tokyo with Miho, who is jailed for gun possession and receives
wise and comic counsel from a marvelous trio of cellmates. 
In a world where everyone tries to make decisions of the
heart with reason, love and passion are lost in triviality.
Someone always asks, "Is there a future for us?"  Can a flirt
ever stop wanting more time or more proof?
The movie is sharply suggests that we take ourselves far too
seriously, that we reason the love right out of our lives. It
hands us the comforting remedy of perspective by reminding us,
three times over, that everything we have ever said, done, or
thought of doing has been done a thousand times in our own and
other languages. A flirt is a flirt is a flirt.  


Title
Review for Bronx Tale, A (1993)
     A BRONX TALE is the splendid product of an actor/director without
an ego.  Robert De Niro plays Lorenzo, a man who protects his family in
their third floor walkup and teaches his son how to stay safe in the
outside world.  This family's outside world is a one block stretch of
the Bronx dominated by Sonny, a tall, cool small-time mobster who runs
the neighborhood from the local pub.
     Although De Niro surfaces from time to time to reaffirm the
presence of a loving father, he hands the movie to his son, Calogero,
and to Sonny.  You can feel director De Niro, hat in hand, taking a
deep bow in their direction as he tells them to go for the brass ring.
     And they do.  Francis Capra is thoroughly appealing as the young
Calogero, Lillo Brancato convincing as his older self, but it is Chazz
Palminiteri, who steals the show with a dazzling performance as Sonny.
He also wrote the screenplay.  But let's start at the beginning.
     DeNiro opens his movie with a slow, rolling invitation to enter
the world of 187th Street. The close harmonies of a doo-wop group pull
us slowly toward the bar that serves as Sonny's command post.  Two
minutes into the film, this world seems absolutely authentic.
     When Calogero does Sonny a life-saving good turn, the mobster's
personal code kicks in: I owe him one.  Shortening Cologero's name to
C, Sonny tutors him in the ways of the street while protecting him from
its darker side. C now loves a father and a mentor who, despite mutual
distrust, give him the same advice in different words:  Rise above it,
get out, stay alive.
     Sonny's unspoken vow to protect C is not an easy one to keep.
Eight years later, C falls for a strong, dignified black girl in a
world where the Italian and black cultures have moved from suspicion to
belligerence.  With his father's and Sonny's words ringing in his head,
C joins the neighborhood losers for a short, fateful moment.
     Chazz Palminteri is both superb and original as Sonny.  We, and
probably he, know he's small-time.  His power derives, as power usually
does, from the fact no one knows what he will do next.  Will he or
won't he?  It's the question that makes lackeys of everyone around
him.  There is not one false note in Palminteri's performance, and if a
hood can have grace, this hood has it.
     The lone sour note comes near the end when C moralizes about
lessons that were delivered with great subtlety throughout the film.
Just ignore him, and prepare for the credits.  After acting and
directing with great restraint, Robert De Niro can barely wait to thank
everyone from "Grandma" to "Pizza Parlor." His gratitude is a warm,
classy salute to the grand cast of non-professionals who make this
movie work so well.


Title
Review for Grumpier Old Men (1995)
"Grumpier Old Men" is a an embarrassing effort to extend the
surprising success of the first installment. In a glaring
insensitivity to the ingredients of their own victory, the
producers have dropped the real star of their show:  the frozen
Minnesota winter. The ice and snow that controlled the residents
and propelled the jokes have been replaced by a summer landscape
that turns Minnesota into the most ordinary of suburbs.    
     In a continuing two-man war story, John (Jack Lemmon) and
Max (Walter Matthau) continue to nourish themselves on the
humiliation they inflict on each other. The first movie focused
on John's comic courtship of the merry widow Ariel (Ann-Margret);
the second opens with confirmation that all is well with their
unlikely marriage.  
     While the envious Max videotapes the scene from next door,
the adoring Ariel sculpts her naked husband as "The Thinker." 
Something has to be done about lonely Max. And so, with exactly
the same likelihood of Ann-Margret's moving to Minnesota, Sophia
Loren, as Maria Ragetti, drops into this dysfunctional town to
turn the boys' favorite bait shop into an Italian restaurant.
     A situation as silly as this must either be wrapped in charm
or buoyed by belly laughs. The first movie had a bit of both.
Although the collective talents of this cast could sustain any
major comedy, their combined efforts can't hoist this one beyond
boredom. They are stranded in a bad script.
     Unengaged, we are reduced to examining face-lifts, capped
teeth, and the general well-being of a group of aging stars. On
this level, Sophia Loren is an astonishing sight--still glorious
in every respect, trying with all her intelligence and flair to
lift her leaden lines. 
     In a charmless subplot to the war between friends, the odd
couple's son and daughter (Daryl Hannah and Kevin Pollak) are to
be married. Their gloomy romance, intended as a comic focus,
casts a pall for miles.  
     After some success the first time around with making Burgess
Meredith a dirty old man at 90 something, the producers inundate
him this time with flat jokes about cucumbers, salami, and a one
night stand with Sophia's mother, Francesca (Ann Guilbert.) 
Guilbert lightens things a little with her general nastiness. She
is indeed a grumpy old woman.
     Jack Lemmon can still immobilize us with the sadness in his
eyes; Matthau can still massage a line with his furrowed brow.
But they have been undermined by producers who thought they had
the golden formula and turned lazy in their success. At the very
least, they should have held onto that icebound landscape that
produced so many laughs. 
     Not one of the four principals is dotty enough to be
relegated to the silliness that Hollywood equates with old age.
It's painful to watch all this talent trying so hard to make
something of nothing. For this formula, even when it was fresh,
once was indeed enough.  


Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
Listen up, world: "Clerks" is a landmark movie, and you
will remember you saw it in 1994. Kevin Smith, writer, producer,
director, editor, and actor, is writing in a new language that
represents not only the arrival of a new generation, but also a
profound change in the world of movies. 
Smith's "Clerks" and Quentin Tarantino's "Pulp Fiction" have
appeared back to back, a double-feature exemplifying the creative
explosion of the video culture so many of us have misunderstood.
Here, then, is the flip side of the conventional wisdom that
watching too much TV dulls the mind. 
Both movies are driven by dialogue born in the minds of men
who have soaked up the rhythms of the video screen. Using a
vocabulary of classic four-letter words not as epithets but as
natural conversation, Smith and Tarantino are saying that this is
the way people talk. If obscenities used to imply a kind of
mental poverty, a literary laziness, they now mean comfortable,
easy exchange. 
Kevin Smith raised $27,000 to make a movie about two
convenience-store clerks on his home turf of Leonardo, NJ, and
walked away with major awards at the Cannes and Sundance film
festivals. His movie chronicles, in excruciating detail, the
nothingness of one day in the life of the lethargic Dante Hicks
(Brian O'Halloran), who wakes up on his day off to discover no
one is running the store. 
Arriving grumpily at the Quick Stop, he steps into his daily
routine and lets the world happen to him. His drifty and
outrageously funny friend, Randall (Jeff Anderson), needles him
relentlessly to grab control of his life. Alas, poor Dante. A
guy who says, "That's what high school is about: algebra, bad
lunch and infidelity," is not likely to be touched by the
pressures of duty, drive, or goals. 
These two spend the day laid out on the floor talking about
girls, hockey, nudie booths, and nothing while selling cigarettes
and coffee to anyone unlucky enough to cross their slothful
paths. They comment on the passing parade of "women who check
the dates looking for milk that won't go bad for a decade" and
"guys who check every egg to get a perfect dozen."
If you can suspend your disbelief and surrender to the feel
of the thing, you will see a very funny, gentle movie played by a
group of perfect slackers. 
Ten years ago, video schmoozing was a new sport. At least
two of the kids transfixed by it grew up to be video clerks,
absorbing B-movie dialogue while missing the picture as they
waited on customers. What stayed in their heads were words, not
images. Kevin Smith and Quentin Tarantino have absorbed the
rhythms of their time, and they are going to teach them to the
rest of us. They have done no less than announce the birth of a
new language and a new way of making movies. 

